Vermont statutes. Title 33 Human Services
Subchapter 6. Placement in Secure Facilities

§ 5291.
Detention or treatment of individuals charged as delinquents in secure facilities for the detention or treatment of delinquent children.

Prior to disposition, the court shall have the sole authority to place a child who is in the custody of the Department in a secure facility used for the detention or treatment of delinquent children until the Commissioner determines that a suitable placement is available for the child. The court shall not order placement in a secure facility without a recommendation from the Department that placement in a secure facility is necessary. The court order shall include a finding that no other suitable placement is available and the child presents a risk of injury to himself or herself, to others, or to property.

Absent good cause shown and notwithstanding section 5227 of this title, when a child is placed in a secure facility pursuant to subsection (a) of this section and remains in a secure facility for 45 days following the preliminary hearing, the merits hearing shall be held and merits adjudicated within 45 days of the date of the preliminary hearing or the court shall dismiss the petition with prejudice. If merits have been found, the court shall review the secure facility placement order at the merits hearing.

If a child is placed in a secure facility pursuant to subsection (a) of this section and secure facility placement continues following the merits hearing review pursuant to subsection (b) of this section, the court shall, within 35 days of the merits adjudication:

hold the disposition hearing, or, if disposition is not held within 35 days;

hold a hearing to review the continued secure facility placement.

A child placed in a secure facility on an order pursuant to subsection (a), (b), or (c) of this section with a finding that no other suitable placement is available and the child presents a risk of harm to others or to property shall be entitled to an independent, second evidentiary hearing, which shall be a hearing de novo by a single justice of the Vermont Supreme Court. The Chief Justice may make an appointment or special assignment in accordance with

4 V.S.A. § 22

to conduct the de novo hearing required by this subsection. Unless the parties stipulate to the admission of portions of the trial court record, the de novo review shall be a new evidentiary hearing without regard to the record compiled before the trial court.

Following disposition, the Commissioner shall have the sole authority to place a child who is in the custody of the Department in a secure facility for the detention or treatment of delinquent children pursuant to the Department’s administrative policies on admission.

HISTORY:

Added

2007, No. 185

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. Jan. 1, 2009; amended

2011, No. 3

, § 96, eff. Feb. 17, 2011;

2017, No. 72

, § 6, eff. July 1, 2018;

2019, No. 124

(Adj. Sess.), § 10.

§ 5292.
Detention in adult facilities of minors charged or adjudicated as delinquents.

A minor charged with a delinquent act shall not be detained under this chapter in a jail or other facility intended or used for the detention of adults unless the child is alleged to have committed a crime punishable by life imprisonment and it appears to the satisfaction of the court that public safety and protection reasonably require such detention.

A minor who has been adjudicated as a delinquent child shall not by virtue of such adjudication be committed or transferred to an institution or other facility used primarily for the execution of sentences of persons convicted of a crime.

The official in charge of a jail or other facility intended or used for the detention of adult offenders or persons charged with crime shall inform the court immediately when a minor who is or appears to be under the age of 18 years is received at the facility other than pursuant to subsection (a) of this section or section 5293 of this title and shall deliver the minor to the court upon request of the court or transfer the minor to the detention facility designated by the court by order.

HISTORY:

Added

2007, No. 185

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. Jan. 1, 2009.

§ 5293.
Disposition of minors adjudicated as adult offenders; separation of persons under 18 years from adults.

Pretrial detention.

A minor who is under the age of 18 who has been arrested shall not be placed in a facility for adult offenders unless a felony charge has been filed in the Criminal Division of the Superior Court or the Criminal Division of the Superior Court has exercised jurisdiction over the matter and the State’s Attorney has determined that a felony charge will be filed without delay. A minor who is eligible for release under 13 V.S.A. chapter 229 shall be released.

A minor who is under the age of 18 who has been arrested for a misdemeanor shall immediately and without first being taken elsewhere:
(2) (A) A minor who is under the age of 18 who has been arrested for a misdemeanor shall immediately and without first being taken elsewhere:

be released to his or her custodial parent, guardian, or custodian; or

be delivered to the Criminal Division of the Superior Court.

If the minor is delivered to the Criminal Division of the Superior Court, the arresting officer shall immediately file written notice thereof with the court together with a statement of the reason for taking the minor into custody. A minor who is eligible for release under 13 V.S.A. chapter 229 shall be released. In the event that the minor is not released:

the minor shall not be detained in a facility for adult offenders; and

the court shall defer to the Commissioner of Corrections concerning the facility in which the minor shall be detained.

Sentencing of minor. If a minor is convicted of an offense in a court of criminal jurisdiction as an adult, the court shall sentence the minor as an adult.

Placement of minors under 16. The Commissioner of Corrections shall not place a minor under the age of 16 who has been sentenced to a term of imprisonment in a correctional facility used to house adult offenders.

Placement of minors over 16 convicted of felony. The Commissioner of Corrections may place in a facility for adult offenders a minor who has attained the age of 16 but is under the age of 18 who has been convicted of a felony and who has been sentenced to a term of imprisonment.

Placement of minor over 16 convicted of misdemeanor. The Commissioner of Corrections shall not place in a facility for adult offenders a minor who has attained the age of 16 but is under the age of 18 who has been convicted of a misdemeanor.

Transfer of minor at 18th birthday. At the 18th birthday of a minor convicted of a misdemeanor, the Commissioner may transfer the minor to a facility for adult offenders.

Applicability. The provisions of this section shall apply to the commitment of minors to institutions within or outside the State of Vermont.

HISTORY:

Added

2007, No. 185

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. Jan. 1, 2009; amended

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 238.